Tennessee, session 114, SB1251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-24-301, is amended by inserting
"within seven (7) business days" after "shall report such cases".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1251
003105
- 1 -